District of Columbia statutes.
32-1605

Repealed

Labor market analysis.

Repealed.

July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-150, § 6, 47 DCR 4644
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 129(c), 56 DCR 1117
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-263, § 2(e), 62 DCR 1518
D.C. Law 17-353 validated a previously made technical correction by substituting “Council” for “Board”.